Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4907.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 907. (1) The Subject to subsection (3), the department, in consultation with the board, shall promulgate rules for the safe construction, installation, inspection, alteration, servicing, operation, and repair of boilers in this state. For purposes of this subsection, the department by rule may adopt or amend all or any part of an existing published codification or national standards and any amendments and interpretations of the codification or standards. (2) A departure from the requirements of this section is permitted in an unusual situation involving a boiler of special design or construction if the board is satisfied that a proposed facility will provide a degree of safety commensurate with the intent of this article. (3) The department shall allow a class 5B boiler installer or a class IV boiler repairer to complete periodic maintenance and testing of controls and safety devices of a boiler system. (4) (3) If the department receives an application and the appropriate fee, the board may without examination register an applicant for the use of a title described in section 931 if the applicant is a boiler operator or stationary engineer who is licensed or registered as a boiler operator or stationary engineer in another state or country or in a municipality whose requirements for licensure or registration are, at a minimum, substantially equivalent to the requirements of this state for registration, as determined by the board, and that other state or country or that municipality extends the same privileges through reciprocity to a boiler operator or stationary engineer who is registered in this state. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Class 5B boiler installer" means an individual who has a class 5B installer's license as described in R 339.5174 of the Michigan Administrative Code. (b) "Class IV boiler repairer" means an individual who has a class IV license as described in R 339.5175 of the Michigan Administrative Code.